New Jersey, session 222, S115.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: County consortium means a group of nonpublic schools in an eligible county which enroll pupils for whom school districts are required to provide transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:39-1 and which enter into an agreement to form a county consortium for the purpose of participating in the pilot program established pursuant to this section. "Eligible county" means a county which in the most recent school year prior to the effective date of this act included a school district which supplied transportation to more than 5,000 pupils residing in the school district in going to and from any remote school other than a public school pursuant to the provisions of N.J.S.18A:39-1. b.    The Commissioner of Education shall establish, supervise, and fund a three-year nonpublic school pupil transportation pilot program in the eligible county through the county consortium.  Notwithstanding any section of law to the contrary, under the pilot program, the commissioner shall disburse directly to the county consortium an amount equal to the aid in-lieu-of transportation amount for each nonpublic school pupil who is attending a nonpublic school which is a part of the county consortium and who is required to be transported by a school district pursuant to N.J.S.18A:39-1.  The county consortium shall assume all of the responsibilities of the school district under N.J.S.18A:39-1 for transporting to and from nonpublic schools the pupils for whom the county consortium received an aid in-lieu-of transportation amount under the pilot program.  If the per pupil cost of the lowest bid received exceeds the aid in-lieu-of transportation amount, then the parent or guardian of the nonpublic school pupil shall be eligible to receive the aid in-lieu-of transportation amount from the county consortium for that school year.  If after providing the required pupil transportation any of the disbursed funds remain unspent, the county consortium, as it deems appropriate, may provide courtesy busing to nonpublic school pupils who are residents of the eligible county and are attending the nonpublic schools which are part of the county consortium.  The county consortium shall refund annually to the Department of Education after the completion of the school year any unexpended funds received pursuant to the pilot program. c.     The county consortium shall assume all of the assets and liabilities incurred as of June 30, 2019 by the consortium established to provide transportation to nonpublic school pupils pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2016, c.22 (C.18A:39-1d). d.    The commissioner shall notify school districts in the eligible county of the pilot program.  The notice shall inform the school districts of: (1)   the county consortiums responsibility under the pilot program to provide all of the transportation to the pupils attending a nonpublic school which is part of the county consortium; (2)   the requirement that the school district may not provide courtesy busing to a pupil attending a nonpublic school which is part of the county consortium; and (3)   the requirement that the school district provide transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:39-1 to pupils attending nonpublic schools which are not a part of the county consortium. e.     In order to participate in the pilot program, the eligible county consortium shall provide to the commissioner the necessary assurances that the consortium is capable of complying with the consortium's pupil transportation responsibilities under the pilot program. f.     The commissioner shall annually enter into a contract with an independent entity to audit the implementation of the pilot program.  The audit for the prior school year shall be submitted to the commissioner no later than December 1 of each year and the commissioner shall transmit a copy of the audit to the Governor and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1). g.    The commissioner shall establish an oversight committee to oversee the operations of the county consortium in implementing the pilot program.  The oversight committee shall consist of five members: three members appointed by the Governor; one member appointed by the President of the Senate; and one member appointed by the Speaker of the General Assembly. h.    Two years following the establishment of the pilot program, the commissioner shall submit a report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1). The report shall contain information on the implementation of the pilot program and shall include the commissioner's recommendation on the advisability of continuing the program and expanding the program Statewide. i.     The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to effectuate the provisions of this act in a manner that comports with the provisions of the State and federal Constitutions. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first be applicable to the 2019-2020 school year.